Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 17. Conversion to a Stock Corporation.

§§ 13.1-941.01 through 13.1-944.

Repealed by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-941.01

, relating to conversion to a stock corporation, was derived from Acts 2002, c. 607; 2015, c. 623.

Former § 13.1-942, relating to articles of restatement, was derived from 1989, c. 609; 2015, c. 623.

Former § 13.1-943, relating to conversion to fees, was derived from 1989, c. 609; 2015, c. 623.

Former § 13.1-944, relating to effect of conversion, was derived from 1989, c. 609; 2015, c. 623.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”